Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5667.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided by this act, all property, including any income or increment derived from the property, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of a holder's business and remains unclaimed by the owner for more than 3 years after it becomes payable or distributable is presumed abandoned. (2) The period after which property is presumed abandoned under subsection (1) is 10 years for pore space compensation under part 653 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65301 to 324.65314. (3) (2) Property is payable or distributable for the purpose of this act, notwithstanding the owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25) or House Bill No. 5669 (request no. H02796'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 a) or House Bill No. 5665 (request no. H02796'25 a). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 b) or House Bill No. 5666 (request no. H02796'25 b). (d) (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02797'25) or House Bill No. 5664 (request no. H02797'25). (e) (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02798'25) or House Bill No. 5668 (request no. H02798'25).